engnvc.lexc
!!!engnvc.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols [stem] +NVC +1sg +2nd +3sg +1pl +3pl +PRES +PAST +wh +neut +masc +fem

LEXICON Root

NVC ;

LEXICON NVC

I[stem]+NVC+1pl+PRES:I've #;
I[stem]+NVC+1sg+PRES:I'd #;
I[stem]+NVC+1sg+PAST:I'd #;
I[stem]+NVC+1sg+PRES:I'm #;
I[stem]+NVC+1sg+PRES:I'll #;
he[stem]+NVC+3sg+PRES+masc:he'll #;
he[stem]+NVC+3sg+PRES+masc:he'd #;
he[stem]+NVC+3sg+PAST+masc:he'd #;
he[stem]+NVC+3sg+PRES:he's #;
here[stem]+NVC+3sg+PRES:here's #;
how[stem]+NVC+3sg+PRES+wh:how's #;
it[stem]+NVC+3sg+PRES+neut:it'll #;
it[stem]+NVC+3sg+PRES:it's #;
she[stem]+NVC+3sg+PRES+fem:she'd #;
she[stem]+NVC+3sg+PAST+fem:she'd #;
she[stem]+NVC+3sg+PRES+fem:she's #;
she[stem]+NVC+3sg+PRES+fem:she'll #;
that[stem]+NVC+3sg+PRES:that'd #;
that[stem]+NVC+3sg+PAST:that'd #;
that[stem]+NVC+3sg+PRES:that's #;
that[stem]+NVC+3sg+PRES:that'll #;
there[stem]+NVC+3sg+PRES:there's #;
there[stem]+NVC+3pl+PRES:there're #;
they[stem]+NVC+3pl+PRES:they'd #;
they[stem]+NVC+3pl+PAST:they'd #;
they[stem]+NVC+3pl+PRES:they've #;
they[stem]+NVC+3pl+PRES:they'll #;
they[stem]+NVC+3pl+PRES:they're #;
we[stem]+NVC+1pl+PRES:we're #;
we[stem]+NVC+1pl+PRES:we'd #;
we[stem]+NVC+1pl+PAST:we'd #;
we[stem]+NVC+1pl+PRES:we'll #;
we[stem]+NVC+1pl+PRES:we've #;
what[stem]+NVC+3sg+PRES+wh:what'll #;
what[stem]+NVC+3sg+PRES+wh:what's #;
when[stem]+NVC+3sg+PRES+wh:when's #;
where[stem]+NVC+3sg+PRES+wh:where's #;
who[stem]+NVC+3sg+PRES+wh:who'd #;
who[stem]+NVC+3sg+PAST+wh:who'd #;
who[stem]+NVC+3sg+PRES+wh:who's #;
who[stem]+NVC+3sg+PRES+wh:who'll #;
who[stem]+NVC+3pl+PRES+wh:who're #;
why[stem]+NVC+3sg+PRES+wh:why's #;
you[stem]+NVC+2nd+PRES:you'll #;
you[stem]+NVC+2nd+PRES:you're #;
you[stem]+NVC+2nd+PRES:you've #;
you[stem]+NVC+2nd+PRES:you'd #;
you[stem]+NVC+2nd+PAST:you'd #;
